North Dakota, session 69, SB2408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. Subdivision lll of subsection 3 of section 19-03.1-05 the North Dakota Century
Code is created and enacted as follows:
lll. Kratom alkaloids and kratom alkaloid derivatives. Unless specifically excepted or
listed in another schedule, any kratom alkaloid or kratom alkaloid derivative ,
including a synthetic or semisynthetic kratom alkaloid derivative, its isomers ,
esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers. Examples include:
(1) Methyl (E)-2-[(2S,3S,12bS)-3-ethyl-8-methoxy-1,2,3,4,6,7,12,12b-
octahydroindolo[2,3-a]quinolizin-2-yl]-3-methoxyprop-2-enoate; also known
as mitragynine.
(2) Methyl (E)2-((2S,3S,7aS)-3-ethyl-7a-hydroxy-8-methoxy-1,2,3,4,6,7,7a,12b-
octahydroindolo[2,3-a]quinolizin-2-yl)-3-methoxyacrylate (also known as 7-
hydroxymitragynine; also known as (alphaE,2S,3S,7aS,12bS)-3-ethyl-
1,2,3,4,6,7,7a,12b-octahydro-7a-hydroxy-8-methoxy-a-(methoxymethylene)-
indolo[2,3-a]quinolizine-2-acetic acid, methyl ester) .
Page No. 1 25.1431.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(3) Methyl (E)-2-((1'S,6'S,7'S)-6'-ethyl-4-methoxy-3-oxo-3',5',6',7',8',8a'-
hexahydro-2'H-spiro[indoline-2,1'-indolizine]-7'-yl)-3-methoxyacrylate (also
known as mitragynine pseudoindoxyl).
(4) Methyl (E)-2-((2S,3S,7aS,12aR,12bS)-3-ethyl-7a-hydroxy-8-methoxy-
1,2,3,4,6,7,7a,12,12a,12b-decahydroindolo[2,3-a]quinolizin-2-yl)-3-
methoxyacrylate (also known as MGM-15; also known as dihydro-7-
hydroxymitragynine).
(5) Methyl (E)-2-((2S,3S,7aS,12aR,12bS)-3-ethyl-9-fluoro-7a-hydroxy-8-
methoxy-1,2,3,4,6,7,7a,12,12a,12b-decahydroindolo[2,3-a]quinolizin-2-yl)-3-
methoxyacrylate (also known as MGM-16; also known as fluoro-dihydro-7-
hydroxymitragynine; also known as 9-fluoro derivate of dihydro-7-
hydroxymitragynine; also known as the 10-fluoro derivate of dihydro-7-
hydroxymitragynine).
(6) Methyl (E)-2-[(2S,3S,7aS,12bS)-7a-acetyloxy-3-ethyl-8-methoxy-
2,3,4,6,7,12b-hexahydro-1H-indolo[2,3-a]quinolizin-2-yl]-3-methoxyprop-2-
enoate (also known as 7-acetoxymitragynine).
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 19-03.1-22.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
19-03.1-22.3. Ingesting a controlled substance - Venue for violation - Penalty.
1. Except as provided in subsectionsubsections 2 and 3, a person who intentionally
ingests, inhales, injects, or otherwise takes into the body a controlled substance,
unless the substance was obtained directly from a practitioner or pursuant to a valid
prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of the practitioner's
professional practice, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. This subsection does not
apply to ingesting, inhaling, injecting, or otherwise taking into the body marijuana or
tetrahydrocannabinol.
2. A person who is under twenty-one years of age and intentionally ingests, inhales,
injects, or otherwise takes into the body a controlled substance that is marijuana or
tetrahydrocannabinol, unless the substance was medical marijuana obtained in
accordance with chapter 19-24.1, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
Page No. 2 25.1431.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
3. A person who intentionally ingests, inhales, injects, or otherwise takes into the body a
controlled substance that is a kratom alkaloid or kratom alkaloid derivative is guilty o f
an infraction for a first offense and a class A misdemeanor for a second or subsequen t
offense.
4. The venue for a violation of this section exists in either the jurisdiction in which the
controlled substance was ingested, inhaled, injected, or otherwise taken into the body
or the jurisdiction in which the controlled substance was detected in the body of the
accused.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 7 of section 19-03.1-23 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
7. a. It is unlawful for any person to willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, possess
a controlled substance or a controlled substance analog unless the substance
was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a
practitioner while acting in the course of the practitioner's professional practice, or
except as otherwise authorized by this chapter, but any person who violates
section 12-46-24 or 12-47-21 may not be prosecuted under this subsection.
b. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any person who violates this
subsection is guilty of a class A misdemeanor for the first offense. If a person is
convicted of a second or subsequent offense not related to marijuana or,
tetrahydrocannabinol , a kratom alkaloid, or a kratom alkaloid derivative under this
section or chapter 19-03.2, 19-03.3, or 19-03.4, or an equivalent offense from
another court in the United States, the violation is a class C felony.
c. If, at the time of the offense the person is in or on the real property comprising a
public or private elementary or secondary school or a public career and technical
education school, the person is guilty of a class B felony, unless the offense
involves marijuana or, tetrahydrocannabinol , a kratom alkaloid, or a kratom
alkaloid derivative.
d. A person who violates this subsection by possessing:
(1) Marijuana:
(a) In an amount of less than one-half ounce [14.175 grams] is guilty of
an infraction.
Page No. 3 25.1431.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(b) At least one-half ounce [14.175 grams] but not more than 500 grams
of marijuana is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(c) More than 500 grams of marijuana is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
(2) Tetrahydrocannabinol:
(a) In an amount less than two grams is guilty of an infraction.
(b) At least two grams but not more than six grams of
tetrahydrocannabinol is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(c) More than six grams of tetrahydrocannabinol is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor.
e. A person who violates this subsection by possessing a kratom alkaloid or kratom
alkaloid derivative is guilty of an infraction for a first offense, a class A
misdemeanor for a second offense, or a class C felony for a third or subsequen t
offense.
f. If an individual is sentenced to the legal and physical custody of the department
of corrections and rehabilitation under this subsection, the department may place
the individual in a drug and alcohol treatment program designated by the
department. Upon the successful completion of the drug and alcohol treatment
program, the department shall release the individual from imprisonment to begin
any court-ordered period of probation.
f.g. If the individual is not subject to any court-ordered probation, the court shall order
the individual to serve the remainder of the sentence of imprisonment on
supervised probation subject to the terms and conditions imposed by the court.
g.h. Probation under this subsection may include placement in another facility,
treatment program, treatment court, mental health court, or veterans treatment
docket. If an individual is placed in another facility or treatment program upon
release from imprisonment, the remainder of the sentence must be considered as
time spent in custody.
h.i. An individual incarcerated under this subsection as a result of a second probation
revocation is not eligible for release from imprisonment upon the successful
completion of treatment.
Page No. 4 25.1431.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
i.j. A person who violates this subsection regarding possession of five or fewer
capsules, pills, or tablets of a schedule II, III, IV, or V controlled substance or
controlled substance analog is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. If a person is
convicted of a second or subsequent offense not related to marijuana or
tetrahydrocannabinol under this section or chapter 19-03.2, 19-03.3, or 19-03.4,
or an equivalent offense from another court in the United States, the violation is a
class C felony.
SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act becomes effective upon its filing with the
secretary of state.
Page No. 5 25.1431.02000